Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-165
Board; unlawful practice; injunction.

Whenever, in the judgment of the board, any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices which constitute, or will constitute, a violation of sections 1-151 to 1-161, the board may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining such acts or practices, and upon a showing by the board that such person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any such acts or practices, an injunction, a restraining order, or such other order as may be appropriate shall be granted by such court without bond.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 60, p. 76;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 59.